public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX xS r endo/P0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo
SFX xS r ende/P0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xS r ento/P0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + nto
SFX xS r ènto/P0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + nto
SFX xS r d fir	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T6 + d[oiae]
SFX xS r t fir	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T6 + d[oiae]
SFX xS r va/J5N0 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xS ir ívelo/I5 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xS r a/J5N0 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xS ir íelo/I5 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xS r ndo/PlN0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xS ir índogelo/Ql fir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xS ir àndogelo/Ql fir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xS r nde/PlN0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xS ir índegelo/Ql fir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xS ir àndegelo/Ql fir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xS r nto/PlN0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xS ir íntogelo/Ql fir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xS 0 à/J5N0 fir	ds:indicative+future is:third	# T4 + rà
SFX xS 0 alo/I5 fir	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xS 0 ave/J7N0 fir	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xS 0 íselo/I7 fir	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xS ir í/SlN0 fir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xS ir ígelo/Dl fir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xS ir è/SlN0 fir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xS ir é/SlN0 fir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xS ir ègelo/Dl fir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xS ir égelo/Dl fir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5, T12 + é
SFX xS ir emo/Sl fir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xS r mo/Sl fir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xS ir ímogelo/Dl fir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xS ir endo/PlN0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo
SFX xS ir ando/PlN0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo
SFX xS ir ende/PlN0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xS ir ande/PlN0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xS ir ento/PlN0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + nto
SFX xS ir èntogelo/Ql fir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T7 + nto
SFX xS r endo/PlN0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo
SFX xS r ende/PlN0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xS r ento/PlN0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + nto
SFX xS r èntogelo/Ql fir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T7 + nto
SFX xS r va/j5N0 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xS ir ívaƚo/i5 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xS r a/j5N0 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xS ir íeƚo/i5 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xS r ndo/P7N0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xS ir índogeƚo/Q7 fir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xS ir àndogeƚo/Q7 fir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xS r nde/P7N0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xS ir índegeƚo/Q7 fir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xS ir àndegeƚo/Q7 fir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xS r nto/P7N0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xS ir íntogeƚo/Q7 fir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xS 0 à/j5N0 fir	ds:indicative+future is:third	# T4 + rà
SFX xS 0 aƚo/i5 fir	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xS 0 ave/j7N0 fir	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xS 0 íseƚo/i7 fir	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xS ir í/S7N0 fir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xS ir ígeƚo/D7 fir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xS ir è/S7N0 fir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xS ir é/S7N0 fir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xS ir ègeƚo/D7 fir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xS ir égeƚo/D7 fir	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xS ir emo/S7 fir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xS r mo/S7 fir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xS ir ímogeƚo/D7 fir	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xS ir endo/P7N0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo
SFX xS ir ando/P7N0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo
SFX xS ir ende/P7N0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xS ir ande/P7N0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xS ir ento/P7N0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + nto
SFX xS ir èntogeƚo/Q7 fir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T7 + nto
SFX xS r endo/P7N0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo
SFX xS r ende/P7N0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xS r ento/P7N0 fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + nto
SFX xS r èntogeƚo/Q7 fir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T7 + nto
SFX xS r ve/J1 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)e
SFX xS ir ívemi/I1 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)e
SFX xS r e/J1I1 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)e
SFX xS ir ee/J1I1 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)e, T2 = T1: aŧento PVT > VT | í > é
SFX xS r va/J3 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)a, 2s=3
SFX xS ir ívatu/I3 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a, 2s=3
SFX xS r stu fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xS r a/J3I3 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)a, 2s=3
SFX xS r s-tu fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX xS ir ea/J3 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)a, 2s=3
SFX xS ir éetu/I3 fir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a, 2s=3, T2 = T1: aŧento PVT > VT | à > é
SFX xS r se/FS fir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + se, 2s=3
SFX xS r s fir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + se
SFX xS r s fir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:third	# T2 + se
SFX xS ir ent fir	ds:participle+active	# T7 + nte
SFX xS ir ènt fir	ds:participle+active	# T7 + nte
SFX xS r ent fir	ds:participle+active	# T7 + nte
SFX xS r ènt fir	ds:participle+active	# T7 + nte
SFX xS ir est fir	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T7 + st[oiae]
SFX xS ir ent fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + nto
SFX xS ir ènt fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + nto
SFX xS r ent fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + nto
SFX xS r ènt fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T7 + nto
SFX xS ir esto/A1FS fir	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T2 + st[oiae], T2 = T1: aŧento PVT > VT | í > é
SFX xS r st fir	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T2 + st[oiae]
SFX xS r nt fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xS ir endo/P0Pl fir	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto, T2 = T1: aŧento PVT > VT | í > é
SFX xS 0 è/J1I1 fir	ds:indicative+future is:first+singular	# T4 + rè
SFX xS 0 on/J2 fir	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural	# T4 + ron
SFX xS 0 oni/I2 fir	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + ron
SFX xS 0 en/J2 fir	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural	# T4 + rén
SFX xS 0 eni/I2 fir	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rén
SFX xS 0 íe fir	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + ríe
SFX xS 0 ee fir	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + rée
SFX xS 0 ee fir	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rée
