public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.dic
fir/xSt1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
fiso/xST8N8tClC7CJ1I1FS	po:verb ds:indicative+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative st:fir
